Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.220.901

Coordination of responsibilities with department of licensing—2017 c 197.

The department of licensing and the office of the superintendent of public instruction must work together on the transfer and coordination of responsibilities to comply with chapter 197, Laws of 2017.

[ 2017 c 197 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2017 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.220.020.